Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1388.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2705 and 2709(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 2705. Classes of licenses.Unless otherwise provided, any person wishing to exercise any of the privileges granted by this title shall first secure the applicable resident or nonresident hunting or furtaker license as follows:* * *(17) Three-day nonresident hunting license. The license shall be valid for the first three days of the regular firearms deer season.§ 2709. License costs and fees.12345678910111213141516171819 (a) License costs.--Any person who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued the applicable license upon payment of the following costs and the issuing agent's fee:* * *(23) Three-day nonresident hunting license - $30. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20260SB1388PN1830 - 2 - 12345678